Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.040

Effect of adjournments.

Adjournments from day to day, or from time to time, are to be construed as recesses in the sessions, and shall not prevent the court from sitting at any time.

[ 1890 p 323 s 7; RRS s 5.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SAR-Rule 5.